Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.540

Certified weight tickets—Retention of copies—Records.

(1) Certified weight tickets shall be delivered to the person receiving the weighed commodity at the time of delivery. The weight ticket must accompany the vehicle that transports such commodity.

(2) A copy must be provided to the seller by the carrier of the weighed commodity.

(3) The weighmaster that provided the certified weight ticket must retain a copy for a period of one year.

(4) The weighmaster must retain such other records as the director shall determine necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(5) These records shall be made available at all reasonable business hours for inspection by the director.

[ 2017 c 158 s 10; 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 25.]